Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-1306
Acquisition of property; procedure.

Whenever any city shall exercise the jurisdiction and authority granted in sections 15-1301 to 15-1307 it shall comply with Chapter 76, article 12, regarding the acquisition of property for publicly financed projects.

Laws 1974, LB 825, § 6.